Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,168
Unattended motor vehicles; conditions.

No person having control or charge of a motor vehicle shall allow such vehicle to stand unattended on a highway without first: (1) Stopping the motor of such vehicle; (2) except for vehicles equipped with motor starters that may be actuated without a key, locking the ignition and removing the key from the ignition; (3) effectively setting the brakes thereon; and (4) when standing upon any roadway, turning the front wheels of such vehicle to the curb or side of such roadway.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 74;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-674;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 264;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 74.